Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 1.1. Elective Share of Surviving Spouse of Decedent Dying on or after January 1, 2017.
§ 64.2-308.15.
Protection of payors and other third parties.

Although under §

64.2-308.6

a payment, item of property, or other benefit is included in the decedent’s non-probate transfers to others, a payor or other third party is not liable for having made a payment or transferred an item of property or other benefit to a beneficiary designated in a governing instrument, or for having taken any other action in good faith reliance on the validity of a governing instrument, upon request and satisfactory proof of the decedent’s death, before the payor or other third party received written notice from the surviving spouse or spouse’s representative as required by §

64.2-308.12

, that a complaint for the elective share has been filed. A payor or other third party is liable for payments made or other actions taken after the payor or other third party received written notice that a complaint for the elective share has been filed.

A written notice that a complaint for the elective share has been filed must be mailed to the payor’s or other third party’s main office or home by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or served upon the payor or other third party in the same manner as a summons in a civil action. Upon receipt of written notice that a complaint for the elective share has been filed, a payor or other third party may pay any amount owed or transfer or deposit any item of property held by it to or with the court having jurisdiction of the probate proceedings relating to the decedent’s estate. The court shall hold the funds or item of property, and, upon its determination under subsection D of §

64.2-308.12

, shall order disbursement in accordance with the determination. If no complaint is filed in the court within the specified time under subsection A of §

64.2-308.12

or, if filed, the election for an elective share is withdrawn under subsection C of §

64.2-308.12

, the court shall order disbursement to the designated beneficiary. Payments or transfers to the court or deposits made into court discharge the payor or other third party from all claims for amounts so paid or the value of property so transferred or deposited.

Upon complaint to the probate court by the beneficiary designated in a governing instrument, the court may order that all or part of the property be paid to the beneficiary in an amount and subject to conditions consistent with this article.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

§ 64.2-308.16.
Rights in family residence.

Until the surviving spouse’s rights in the principal family residence have been determined and satisfied by an agreement between the parties or a final court decree, in cases (i) where the principal family residence passes under the provisions of §

64.2-200

and the decedent is survived by children or their descendants, one or more of whom are not children or their descendants of the surviving spouse, or (ii) where the surviving spouse claims an elective share in the decedent’s augmented estate under this article, the surviving spouse may hold, occupy, and enjoy the principal family residence and curtilage without charge for rent, repairs, taxes, or insurance. If the surviving spouse is deprived of possession of the principal family residence and curtilage, upon the filing of a complaint for unlawful entry or detainer, he is entitled to recover possession of such residence and damages sustained by him by reason of such deprivation during the time he was so deprived. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair the lien or delay the enforcement of such lien of the Commonwealth or any locality for the taxes assessed upon the property.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.

§ 64.2-308.17.
Statutory rights barred by desertion or abandonment.

If a parent willfully deserts or abandons his minor or incapacitated child and such desertion or abandonment continues until the death of the child, the parent shall be barred of all interest in the child’s estate by intestate succession.

History.

2016, cc. 187, 269.